Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-110
Federal act, defined.

Federal act means the federal Communications Act of 1934, as amended, including the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996, as such acts existed on January 1, 2002.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 11.